Mississippi, session 2026, SB2600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting on behalf of the State of Mississippi, is authorized to sell and convey all right, title and interest of the State of Mississippi in and to the real property and improvements thereon located at 1141 Bayview Avenue, Biloxi, Mississippi, commonly known as the Dr. Edon Langston Bolton State Office Building, together with any improvements located thereon and any property related thereto. (2)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall obtain a legal description of the property prior to conveyance, and such legal description shall be included in the deed or other instrument of conveyance. (3)  The transfer and conveyance authorized in subsection (1) of this section may be made at a public or private sale, for cash or upon such other terms and conditions as the Department of Finance and Administration may deem appropriate and in the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  The department is authorized to advertise the sale in such manner as it determines appropriate and may determine the manner and timing of the sale. (4)  The property shall be sold for not less than fair market value as determined by two (2) professional, certified general appraisers selected by the Department of Finance and Administration according to Section 29-1-1. (5)  The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to execute and deliver, in the name of and on behalf of the State of Mississippi, any deeds, bills of sale or other instruments necessary to convey the property. (6)  The proceeds derived from the sale of the real property and improvements authorized under this act, after deduction of reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the sale, shall be deposited into the State General Fund. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.